Utah statutes.
63H-4-110.   Lease of rails from Department of Transportation and Division of Parks and Recreation.

The Department of Transportation and the Division of Parks and Recreation shall jointly lease the rails, bed, right-of-way, and related property for not more than $1 per year to the authority.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 370, 2011 General Session

